Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 1. Divorce and Annulment.
Sec. 25.24.180.
Effect of divorce.

The effect of a judgment decreeing a divorce is to restore the parties to the state of unmarried persons.

History.

(§ 12.16 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.230. Renumbered in 1983.

Collateral references. —

Effect of annulment of marriage on rights arising out of prior acts of or transactions between parties, 2 ALR2d 637.

Pendency of prior action for absolute or limited divorce between same spouses in same jurisdiction as precluding subsequent action of like nature, 31 ALR2d 442.

Effect of divorce upon right to administer upon estate of spouse, 34 ALR2d 876.

Effect of divorce or annulment on competency of one former spouse as witness against other in criminal prosecution, 38 ALR2d 570.

Paternity, legitimacy, or legitimation as determined in action for divorce, separation, or annulment upon vacating or opening decree, 65 ALR2d 1381.

Effect of divorce on homestead, 84 ALR2d 703.

Effect of divorce on widow’s pension or bonus rights or social security benefits, 85 ALR2d 242.

Presumption of legitimacy of child born after annulment, divorce, or separation, 46 ALR3d 158.

Divorce or annulment as affecting will previously executed by husband or wife, 71 ALR3d 1297.

Spouse’s liability, after divorce, for community debt contracted by other spouse during marriage, 20 ALR4th 211.